Hawaii, session 2025, HB1185.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that Hawaii's climate, with a year-round growing season and ample rain in many areas, offers several potential advantages for growing plant-based materials that can be processed into structural building materials. For example, there are types of clumping bamboo that can grow very rapidly with sufficient water; be processed into building materials that are stronger, more flexible, and lighter than timber or steel; and be made more fire- and termite-resistant than wood. For example, "hempcrete", developed from industrial hemp, can substitute for building blocks, while "biocements", produced from cyanobacteria (blue-green algae or "pond scum"), can substitute for Portland cement. The legislature further finds that these and other plant-based building materials could also attract green agricultural jobs to Hawaii.  The legislature also finds that the use of plant-based building materials could help the State meet its net negative carbon and greenhouse gas emission goals because they sequester carbon, whereas the production of traditional building materials, such as timber, steel, and cement, emit very large amounts of greenhouse gases. Therefore, the legislature finds that this issue is a matter of statewide concern.  Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to establish and appropriate funds for a working group to study and report on how best to grow plants and develop plant-based building materials in Hawaii. SECTION 2.  (a) There is established within the university of Hawaii at Manoa college of tropical agriculture and human resilience a plant-based building materials working group to study and report on how best to grow plants and develop plant-based building materials in Hawaii, including for the provision of green agricultural jobs in Hawaii and the sequestration of carbon and greenhouse gases to help the State meet its net negative carbon and greenhouse gas goals. (b)  The working group shall consist of the following members: (1)  The dean and director for research and cooperative extension of the university of Hawaii, or the dean and director's designee, who shall serve as chairperson of the working group; (2)  The director of the university of Hawaii at Hilo college of agriculture, forestry, and natural resource management, or the director's designee; (3)  The chairperson of the board of agriculture, or the chairperson's designee; (4)  The coordinator of the Hawaii climate change mitigation and adaptation commission; (5)  Four individuals who have expertise in growing or producing plant-based building materials, to be invited by the chairperson of the working group; (6)  An expert in building materials, to be invited by the chairperson of the working group, in consultation with the General Contractors Association of Hawaii; and (7)  Additional members with appropriate specialized expertise, as recommended by the members of the working group and at the discretion of and to be invited by the chairperson of the working group. (c)  The members of the working group shall serve without compensation but shall be reimbursed for reasonable expenses, including travel expenses, incurred in the performance of their duties. (d)  The working group shall submit to the legislature: (1)  An interim report regarding the progress of its work no later than twenty days prior to the convening of the regular session of 2026; and (2)  A final report of its findings and recommendations, including any proposed legislation, no later than twenty days prior to the convening of the regular session of 2027. (e)  The working group shall be dissolved on June 30, 2027. SECTION 3.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 to support the work of the plant-based building materials working group established pursuant to section 2 of this Act. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the university of Hawaii for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 3000.